District of Columbia statutes.
47-3904

Exemptions.

(a)

Gross charges from the sale, by any toll or wireless telecommunication company, of toll telecommunication or District-based wireless telecommunication service for resale to any other toll or wireless telecommunication company or public utility subject to tax under this chapter or § 47-2501 shall be exempt from taxation under this chapter.

(b)

Gross charges from the sale, by any public utility of utility service for resale to a toll telecommunication or wireless telecommunication company subject to tax under this chapter shall be exempt from taxation under § 47-2501.

Sept. 20, 1989, D.C. Law 8-26, § 5, 36 DCR 4723
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 30, 1998, D.C. Law 12-100, § 2(e), 45 DCR 1533
1981 Ed., § 47-3904.